District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.73

POWER — Application.

(a)

The Mayor may only consider TANF applicants or TANF recipients for consideration for POWER eligibility.

(b)

The Mayor may refer a TANF applicant or recipient for consideration of POWER eligibility at any time, including when a TANF applicant or recipient claims a medical incapacity exemption from work activities.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 573
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 4(g), 46 DCR 905

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-205.19m and § 4-205.72.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-205.73.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 4(h) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

See notes to § 4-205.69.